Connecticut, session 2026, HB05324.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 17a-106h of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Children and Families, in consultation with
the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection, shall
develop an initial educational training program and refresher training
program for the accurate and prompt identification and reporting of
suspected human trafficking.
(b) The training program shall include a presentation, developed and
approved by said commissioners, that offers awareness of human
trafficking issues and guidance to (1) law enforcement personnel, (2)
judges of the Superior Court, (3) prosecutors, (4) public defenders and
other attorneys who represent criminal defendants, (5) hospital
emergency room staff, urgent care facility staff and emergency medical
services personnel who have contact with patients, and (6) persons
employed by a local or regional board of education or a constituent unit,
as defined in section 10a-1, who have contact with students.
(c) Any person described in subsection (b) of this section shall
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5324
complete the initial educational training program not later than July 1,
2018, and, except for a person described in subdivision (6) of said
subsection, shall complete the refresher training program every three
years thereafter, provided any person being employed as such a person
shall complete such initial educational training program not later than
six months after beginning such employment or July 1, 2018, whichever
is later.
Sec. 2. Subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of section 22a-226e of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(5) On and after July 1, [2026] 2028, each public or nonpublic school
building or educational facility in which students in grades
kindergarten to twelve, inclusive, or any combination thereof, are
enrolled, that is located not more than twenty miles from either an
authorized source-separated organic material composting facility and
that generates an average projected volume of not less than twenty-six
tons per year of source-separated organic materials shall: (A) Separate
such source-separated organic materials from other solid waste; and (B)
ensure that such source-separated organic materials are recycled at any
authorized source-separated organic material composting facility that
has available capacity and that will accept such source-separated
organic material.
Sec. 3. Subsection (f) of section 10-262j of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(f) Any district that has (1) elected to act as a self-insurer, pursuant to
section 10-236, (2) experienced a loss that is overexposure of an insured
member or incurred as a result of one or more catastrophic events, as
declared by a nationally recognized catastrophe loss index provider,
during the prior fiscal year, and (3) increased its budgeted appropriation
for education during said prior fiscal year as a result of such loss, shall
not be required to include the amount of such increase in the calculation
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5324
of such district's budgeted appropriation for education for the
subsequent fiscal year.
Sec. 4. Section 10-260b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There is established the Education Mandate Review Advisory
Council. The council shall advise and provide annual reports to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to education on the cost and implementation of existing
education mandates on local and regional boards of education, as well
as the impact of any proposals relating to additions or revisions to such
education mandates. Such annual reports may include, but need not be
limited to, (1) a review of each education mandate on local and regional
boards of education passed by the General Assembly during the prior
legislative session and not fewer than ten existing education mandates
on local and regional boards of education [in] required by the general
statutes and the regulations of Connecticut state agencies for the
purpose of identifying those mandates that may be burdensome or have
the effect of limiting or restricting the provision of instruction or services
to students, including a detailed analysis of each such mandate so
identified, the specific statutory or regulation citation for such mandate
and how such mandate is imposed on a board of education, and (2) any
recommendations regarding the repeal of or amendment to any such
sections of the general statutes or regulations of Connecticut state
agencies.
(b) The council shall consist of the following members:
(1) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
who shall be a representative of the Connecticut Association of Boards
of Education;
(2) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, who
shall be a representative of the Connecticut Association of Public School
Superintendents;
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5324
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, who shall be a representative of the Connecticut
Association of Schools;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who shall be
a representative of the Connecticut Association of School Business
Officials;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, who shall be a member of a local or regional board of
education;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, who shall be
a representative of the Connecticut Federation of School
Administrators;
(7) One appointed by the House chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to education, who shall be a paraeducator in a public school in
this state;
(8) One appointed by the Senate chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
100 relating to education, who shall be a representative of the Connecticut
101 Education Association;
102 (9) One appointed by the House ranking member of the joint standing
103 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
104 relating to education, who shall be a paraeducator in a public school in
105 this state; and
106 (10) One appointed by the Senate ranking member of the joint
107 standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
108 matters relating to education, who shall be a representative of the
109 American Federation of Teachers-Connecticut.
110 (c) All initial appointments to the council shall be made not later than
111 August 1, 2024. The initial terms for the members appointed shall
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5324
112 terminate on January 31, 2029. Terms following the initial terms shall be
113 for five years. Any member of the council may serve more than one
114 term. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority.
115 (d) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president
116 pro tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the council
117 from among the members of the council. Such chairpersons shall
118 schedule the first meeting of the council, which shall be held not later
119 than October 1, 2024.
120 (e) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
121 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education
122 shall serve as administrative staff of the council.
123 (f) The council shall have the following powers and duties: (1) Review
124 education mandates and submit annual reports pursuant to the
125 provisions of subsection (a) of this section; (2) obtain from any executive
126 department, board, commission or other agency of the state such
127 assistance and data as necessary and available to carry out the purposes
128 of this section; (3) accept any gift, donation or bequest for the purpose
129 of performing the duties described in this section; (4) establish bylaws
130 to govern its procedures; and (5) perform such other acts as may be
131 necessary and appropriate to carry out the duties described in this
132 section.
133 [(f)] (g) Not later than January 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the
134 council shall develop and submit an annual report on its review of the
135 implementation and cost of statutory and regulatory education
136 mandates on local and regional boards of education. Such annual report
137 shall include, but need not be limited to, (1) a review of [all] each
138 education mandate on local and regional boards of education passed by
139 the General Assembly during the prior legislative session and not fewer
140 than ten existing education mandates required by state law, (2) the costs
141 incurred by local and regional boards of education resulting from the
142 implementation of such education mandates, and (3) how such
143 education mandates are being implemented by local and regional
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5324
144 boards of education, including, but not limited to, the manner in which
145 and how often such education mandate is being implemented. The
146 council shall submit such report, and any recommendations for
147 legislation, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
148 having cognizance of matters relating to education and the
149 Commissioner of Education, in accordance with the provisions of
150 section 11-4a.
151 Sec. 5. Sections 10-14ee, 10-212l, 10-212m and 10-234gg of the general
152 statutes are repealed. (Effective July 1, 2026)
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17a-106h
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 22a-226e(a)(5)
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 10-262j(f)
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 10-260b
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 Repealer section
ED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6